Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-42] Rights to public lands not
forfeited; grazing lands. (a) No right to any lands owned or controlled
by the State, initiated or acquired under any laws of the State, including the
mining and mineral leasing laws, by a person prior to entering state military
service shall during the period of that service be forfeited or prejudiced by
reason of the person's absence from the land or the person's failure to perform
any work or make any improvements thereon or the person's failure to do any
other act required by or under those laws.

(b) This section does not control specific
requirements contained in this part. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next